sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
anzvira/AVQ
badaritsa/AVQ
banganutsa/AVQ
bata-bata/AVQ
batsirikana/AVQ
bekura/AVQ
betsa/AVQ
bhadharisa/AVQ
bhana/AVQ
bhedhenura/AVQ
bheutsa/AVQ
bhitisa/AVQ
bhovhora/AVQ
bhugumura/AVQ
bhuyira/AVQ
bikana/AVQ
binyaidza/AVQ
bisira/AVQ
bodotsa/AVQ
bonda/AVQ
booka/AVQ
boza/AVQ
budisira/AVQ
bumbunudza/AVQ
bunurika/AVQ
burura/AVQ
bvakacha/AVQ
bvanzura/AVQ
bvemberedza/AVQ
bvirira/AVQ
bvonga/AVQ
bvorongota/AVQ
bvujuka/AVQ
bvumba/AVQ
bvundika/AVQ
bvunza/AVQ
bvuruvara/AVQ
bwagamura/AVQ
bwazha/AVQ
bwereketa/AVQ
bwinda/AVQ
bwododza/AVQ
chachama/AVQ
chachurira/AVQ
chakapitidza/AVQ
chanjanjika/AVQ
charudza/AVQ
chechemara/AVQ
chechudza/AVQ
chekesa/AVQ
chendama/AVQ
chenjerera/AVQ
chepesa/AVQ
cheudza/AVQ
chichinuka/AVQ
chingaidza/AVQ
chipa/AVQ
chiwa/AVQ
chokota/AVQ
chovhera/AVQ
chuvhura/AVQ
dadirwa/AVQ
dakarira/AVQ
danhika/AVQ
dashuka/AVQ
dedenhera/AVQ
dema/AVQ
dengendedza/AVQ
deranirano/AVQ
deuteu/AVQ
dhadharika/AVQ
dhara/AVQ
dhembuka/AVQ
dhinda/AVQ
dhirivha/AVQ
dhogomesa/AVQ
dhubvura/AVQ
dhura/AVQ
didimuka/AVQ
dimbukidza/AVQ
diridza/AVQ
dodonya/AVQ
dondoza/AVQ
dopotsa/AVQ
dudzira/AVQ
dumbira/AVQ
dupuka/AVQ
duza/AVQ
dyiririra/AVQ
dzadzaridza/AVQ
dzamira/AVQ
dzatusa/AVQ
dzengeredza/AVQ
dziisa/AVQ
dzima/AVQ
dzimurirana/AVQ
dzivira/AVQ
dzonya/AVQ
dzura/AVQ
dzvinyirira/AVQ
edzana/AVQ
engaira/AVQ
fadzisa/AVQ
fandyuka/AVQ
fashuka/AVQ
fembera/AVQ
fenyuka/AVQ
fikura/AVQ
fizura/AVQ
fonyana/AVQ
fozodza/AVQ
fugama/AVQ
fukusira/AVQ
fundumwarira/AVQ
funza/AVQ
furuka/AVQ
futyunura/AVQ
gadzana/AVQ
gamuchirika/AVQ
garira/AVQ
gezera/AVQ
gogomera/AVQ
gonesa/AVQ
guda-guda/AVQ
gumara/AVQ
gundurukira/AVQ
guruza/AVQ
gwadaira/AVQ
gwavaira/AVQ
gwenjeredza/AVQ
hamba/AVQ
hon'a/AVQ
hwara/AVQ
hwishura/AVQ
ita/AVQ
janhira/AVQ
jikichira/AVQ
kaba/AVQ
kakanura/AVQ
kamhinisa/AVQ
kanganisira/AVQ
kapara/AVQ
kashama/AVQ
kavarika/AVQ
kinditsa/AVQ
kodobora/AVQ
kokorodza/AVQ
kondekana/AVQ
kopfaira/AVQ
koshora/AVQ
koya/AVQ
kukura/AVQ
kumwaira/AVQ
kupira/AVQ
kusvidzira/AVQ
kuzirira/AVQ
kwama/AVQ
kwaranzura/AVQ
kwechenura/AVQ
kwesera/AVQ
kwindidza/AVQ
mamisa/AVQ
marika/AVQ
mbumudza/AVQ
memetedza/AVQ
mhemhaira/AVQ
mirisana/AVQ
monyorora/AVQ
mvanya/AVQ
mwarira/AVQ
mwita/AVQ
namura/AVQ
n'ara'/AVQ
ndarazura/AVQ
ndondora/AVQ
nemesa/AVQ
ngandaira/AVQ
ngondika/AVQ
ngura-ngura/AVQ
ngwenderedza/AVQ
nhoka/AVQ
nin'inidza/AVQ
njena-njena/AVQ
nomboka/AVQ
nunura/AVQ
nyakatisa/AVQ
nyangira/AVQ
nyatura/AVQ
nyenyama/AVQ
nyeya/AVQ
nyogodeka/AVQ
nyukutira/AVQ
nzonzonda/AVQ
nzwarwo/AVQ
omesera/AVQ
orora/AVQ
pagadudza/AVQ
pambika/AVQ
pandira/AVQ
papamara/AVQ
parura/AVQ
paumba/AVQ
pembenuka/AVQ
peperetsa/AVQ
pesvedzera/AVQ
pfanya/AVQ
pferenzura/AVQ
pfizuka/AVQ
-pfuduka/AVQ
pfumbamwe/AVQ
pfundunuka/AVQ
pfupika/AVQ
pfuvisa/AVQ
pimuka/AVQ
pinya/AVQ
piripitika/AVQ
pokana/AVQ
popotera/AVQ
psva/AVQ
pundira/AVQ
pupurudza/AVQ
putiridza/AVQ
pwatika/AVQ
rabvanyura/AVQ
rambanisa/AVQ
rapatika/AVQ
rauka/AVQ
regwedeka/AVQ
rengendudza/AVQ
rhecha/AVQ
rinda/AVQ
ritaira/AVQ
roora/AVQ
rowanura/AVQ
rumbirirana/AVQ
ruvira/AVQ
sahuka/AVQ
sandidzira/AVQ
sasanuka/AVQ
semesa/AVQ
sesekedza/AVQ
shamaira/AVQ
shanya/AVQ
shayika/AVQ
shina-shina/AVQ
shodoka/AVQ
shopa/AVQ
shungushira/AVQ
shwapura/AVQ
simika/AVQ
siyanisa/AVQ
sorodha/AVQ
sumura/AVQ
sunura/AVQ
suwa/AVQ
svayadidza/AVQ
svikirana/AVQ
svodogoka/AVQ
svotosa/AVQ
swatuka/AVQ
taidzira/AVQ
tambarara/AVQ
tandara/AVQ
tanjarika/AVQ
taranza/AVQ
tatanuka/AVQ
teba/AVQ
tekereka/AVQ
tendedzera/AVQ
tenhesa/AVQ
tesva/AVQ
tevedza/AVQ
tikidza/AVQ
tinhura/AVQ
tocha/AVQ
tongera/AVQ
toya/AVQ
tsanika/AVQ
tsedemuka/AVQ
tsetsa/AVQ
tsima/AVQ
tsira/AVQ
tsoma/AVQ
tsukunyuka/AVQ
tsurundundira/AVQ
tsvaringidza/AVQ
tsvetera/AVQ
tsvotidza/AVQ
tubvunya/AVQ
tukwa/AVQ
tunhidzira/AVQ
tusa/AVQ
tuzuka/AVQ
tywakatika/AVQ
una/AVQ
unza/AVQ
vadza/AVQ
vangisa/AVQ
vedza/AVQ
vhaidza/AVQ
vheneka/AVQ
vhindika/AVQ
vhonokora/AVQ
vhundunyu/AVQ
vhuvhutisa/AVQ
virutsa/AVQ
wainda/AVQ
watsamura/AVQ
wodzeka/AVQ
wunga/AVQ
yaza/AVQ
yeyisa/AVQ
zavazira/AVQ
zhamba/AVQ
zhizha/AVQ
zivisisa/AVQ
zunguzira/AVQ
zvereredza/AVQ
zvirereka/AVQ
